Florida, session 2026, SB26.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 62 63 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 64 found and declared to be true. 65 Section 2.âThe sum of $2.2 million is appropriated from the 66 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 67 relief of the Estate of Mark LaGatta for injuries and damages 68 sustained by Mr. LaGatta. 69 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 70 a warrant in favor of the Estate of Mark LaGatta in the amount 71 of $2.2 million upon funds of the Department of Transportation 72 in the State Treasury and to pay the same out of such funds in 73 the State Treasury. 74 Section 4.âThe amount paid by the Department of 75 Transportation pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the 76 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 77 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 78 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 79 injuries and damages to Mark LaGatta. The total amount paid for 80 attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent 81 of the total amount awarded under this act. 82 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.